District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

39-402

Authorization to provide public support for arts, cultural, and educational facilities.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-271, § 3, 52 DCR 820
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7181(a), 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7181(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7181(a), of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short Title

Short title: Section 7180 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle P of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Capital Grant Authority Repeal Amendment Act of 2009”.